Montana, session 2025, HB174.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 45-5-201, MCA, is amended to read:
"45-5-201. Assault. (1) (a) A person commits the offense of assault if the person:
(a)(i) (A)purposely or knowingly causes bodily injury to another;
(b)(ii) (B) negligently causes bodily injury to another with a weapon;
(c)(iii) (C) purposely or knowingly makes physical contact of an insulting or provoking nature with
any individual;
(d)(iv) (D) purposely or knowingly causes reasonable apprehension of bodily injury in another; or
(e)(v) (E) except as provided in subsections (1)( b) (i) through (1)(b) (iv) (III), purposely or
knowingly provides an individual with rohypnol, flunitrazolam, or gamma-hydroxybutyrate, specific dangerous
drugs included in Schedules I, II, III, IV, and V as provided in 50-32-222, 50-32-224, 50-32-226, 50-32-229, and
50-32-232, alcohol, ANY VACCINE, and diphenhydramine, without the individual's EXPRESS, INFORMED, OR IMPLIED
consent OR THE EXPRESS, INFORMED, OR IMPLIED CONSENT OF THE INDIVIDUAL'S PARENT, GUARDIAN, OR MEDICAL
POWER OF ATTORNEY.

(b) For prescription medication, subsection (1)(a)(v) does not apply to the following:

(i) medical providers with the authority to prescribe or administer medication ;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 174

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0174.3
(ii) patients of medical providers described in subsection (1)(b)(i);

(iii) parents or guardians who have valid prescriptions for their minor children and minor children
who are unable to consent under their care ; and

(iv)(III) guardians of adults who are incapacitated and who cannot consent or make their own health
care decisions.

(c) Subsection (1)(a)(v) does not apply to the administration of an opioid overdose reversal
medication, including but not limited to naloxone and nalmefene ..
(2) A person convicted of assault shall be fined not to exceed $500 or be imprisoned in the county
jail for any term not to exceed 6 months, or both."
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 174